lt-LT: Stambiavaisės basovijos veislė: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Kita
fi: Tamarillon lajike: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Punainen; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Muu
nb: Tamarillovariant: Rav; Gull; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Rød; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Annet
ko: 타마릴로 품종: 앰버; 골드; 레어드 라지; 오라티아 레드; 레드; 루비 레드; 솔리드 골드; 스위트 앰버; 기타
hu: Tamarillo fajtája: Borostyánsárga; Arany; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Piros; Rubinpiros; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Egyéb
en: Tamarillo variety: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Other
fr: Variété de tamarillo: Ambrée; Or; Laird’s Large; Oratia Red; Rouge; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Autre
es: Variedad de tamarillo: Ámbar; Oro; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Rojo; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Otra
pl: Odmiana tamarillo: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Inne
da: Tamarillovariant: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Rød; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Andet
ja: タマリロの種類: アンバー; ゴールド; レアーズラージ; オラティヤレッド; レッド; ルビーレッド; ソリッドゴールド; スウィートアンバー; その他
bg-BG: Сорт тамарило: Кехлибарен; Златен; Лердс лардж; Оратия ред; Червен; Рубиненочервен; Солид голд; Суийт амбър; Друго
pt-BR: Variedade Tamarillo: Âmbar; Dourado; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Vermelho; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Outro
nl: Tamarillovariëteit: Amber; Goud; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Rood; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Overig
th: พันธุ์ทามาริลโล: แอมเบอร์; สีทอง; แลร์ดสลาร์จ; โอราเทียเรด; สีแดง; รูบี้เรด; โซลิดโกลด์; สวีตแอมเบอร์; อื่นๆ
el: Ποικιλία ταμαρίλλο: Κεχριμπαρένιο; Χρυσό; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Κόκκινο; Ρουμπινί; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Άλλο
pt-PT: Variedade de tamarilho: Âmbar; Dourado; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Vermelho; Vermelho rubi; Dourado sólido; Âmbar doce; Outro
hr-HR: Sorta tamarila: Amber; Zlatni; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Crveni; Rubin crveni; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Ostalo
de: Auswahl an Tamarillos: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Rot; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Sonstige
vi: Giống cà chua bi Tamarillo: Hổ phách; Vàng; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Đỏ; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Khác
sl-SI: Sorta tamarila: Jantarni; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Drugo
sk-SK: Druh ovocia tamarillo: Jantárová; Zlatá; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Červená; Rubínovo červená; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Iné
ro-RO: Soi de tamarillo: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Altele
zh-TW: 樹番茄品種: 琥珀; 金色; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; 紅色; 紅寶石; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; 其他
zh-CN: 树番茄品种: 琥珀色; 金色; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; 红色; 红宝石色; 纯金色; 甜琥珀色; 其他
cs: Odrůda rajčenky: Amber; Gold; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Červená; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Jiné
sv: Tamarillosort: Amber; Guld; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Röd; Rubinröd; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Annat
tr: Tamarillo çeşidi: Kehribar; Altın; Laird's Large; Oratia Red; Kırmızı; Yakut kırmızısı; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Diğer
ru: Сорт тамарилло: Янтарный; Золотой; Лэрдс Лардж; Оратия Ред; Красный; Рубиново-красный; Солид Голд; Свит Амбер; Другое
it: Varietà di tamarillo: Amber; Gold; Laird’s Large; Oratia Red; Red; Ruby Red; Solid Gold; Sweet Amber; Altro